Hawaii, session 2026, SB1113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 163D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§163D-    Kohala ditch program.  (a) The corporation shall be responsible for the routine maintenance and repair of the Kohala ditch. (b)  The corporation shall develop and implement a comprehensive plan for the routine maintenance of the Kohala ditch, which shall: (1)  Include a schedule for regular inspections, necessary repairs, and upgrades to follow best practices and standards for safety and efficiency; and (2)  Be developed in collaboration with the surrounding community and relevant agencies and stakeholders, including farmers, ranchers, business, and other users of the Kohala ditch. (c)  The corporation shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session; provided that the report shall: (1)  Detail any maintenance and repairs to the Kohala ditch, including any related expenditures; (2)  Include an assessment of the current condition of the Kohala ditch; (3)  Include a summary of completed maintenance activities; and (4)  Make recommendations for any further improvements." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $9,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the construction, repairs, and maintenance of the Kohala ditch. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the agribusiness development corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________